West Virginia, session 2025, SB7.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 2. CRIMES AGAINST THE PERSON. §61-2-5b. Desecration of deceased human body; penalty; definition of "desecrate"; exception. (a) Any person who, by any means, knowingly and willfully desecrates, attempts to desecrate, or who otherwise aids and abets any person to desecrate a deceased human body where death occurred as a result of criminal activity is guilty of a felony and, upon conviction thereof, shall be confined in a correctional facility for not less than two years nor more than ten years and fined not less than $2,000, nor more than $10,000: Provided, That a term of imprisonment imposed pursuant to the provisions of this section shall be imposed as a consecutive sentence and shall not be served concurrently with any imprisonment, confinement, or detention imposed under any prior sentence being served or otherwise being discharged at the time such person commits an offense under the provisions of this section.(b) For purposes of this section, "desecrate" means destroying, cutting, mutilating, dismembering, damaging, otherwise physically mistreating a deceased human body or any part thereof in a way that a reasonable person knows will outrage the sensibilities of persons likely to observe or discover his or her actions.(c) The provisions of subsection (a) of this section do not apply to practitioners regulated by the provisions of §30-6-1 et seq. or their agents while acting in their lawful professional capacities.